California, session 20252026, AB1352.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:39719. (a) The Legislature shall appropriate the annual proceeds of the fund for the purpose of reducing greenhouse gas emissions in this state in accordance with the requirements of Section 39712.(b) To carry out a portion of the requirements of subdivision (a), the annual proceeds of the fund are continuously appropriated for the following:(1) Beginning in the 2015–16 fiscal year, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, 35 percent of the annual proceeds of the fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for transit, affordable housing, and sustainable communities programs as follows:(A) Ten percent of the annual proceeds of the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the Transportation Agency for the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program created by Part 2 (commencing with Section 75220) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code.(B) Five percent of the annual proceeds of the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program created by Part 3 (commencing with Section 75230) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code. Moneys shall be allocated by the Controller, according to requirements of the program, and pursuant to the distribution formula in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 99312 of, and Sections 99313 and 99314 of, the Public Utilities Code.(C) Twenty percent of the annual proceeds of the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the Strategic Growth Council for the Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program created by Part 1 (commencing with Section 75200) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code. Of the amount appropriated in this subparagraph, no less than 10 percent of the annual proceeds of the fund shall be expended for affordable housing, consistent with the provisions of that program.(2) Beginning in the 2015–16 fiscal year, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, and subject to the requirements of Section 39719.3, 25 percent of the annual proceeds of the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the High-Speed Rail Authority for the following components of the initial operating segment and Phase I Blended System as described in the 2012 business plan adopted pursuant to Section 185033 of the Public Utilities Code:(A) Acquisition and construction costs of the project.(B) Environmental review and design costs of the project.(C) Other capital costs of the project.(D) Repayment of any loans made to the authority to fund the project.(3) (A) Beginning in the 2020–21 fiscal year, and until June 30, 2030, 5 percent of the annual proceeds of the fund, up to the sum of one hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000), is hereby annually transferred to the Safe and Affordable Drinking Water Fund established pursuant to Section 116766 for the purposes of Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 116765) of Part 12 of Division 104.(B) Moneys transferred under this paragraph shall be used for the purpose of facilitating the achievement of reductions of greenhouse gas emissions in this state in accordance with the requirements of Section 39712 or to improve climate change adaptation and resiliency of disadvantaged communities or low-income households or communities, consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500). For purposes of the moneys transferred under this paragraph, a state agency may also comply with the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16428.9 of the Government Code by describing how each proposed expenditure will improve climate change adaptation and resiliency of disadvantaged communities or low-income households or communities.(4) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, 10 percent of the annual proceeds of the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the state board to implement the programs described in Sections 42705.5 and 44391.2, including, but not limited to, funding grants, providing technical assistance, supporting community participation, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 44391.2, and offering incentives for projects described in subdivision (b) of Section 44391.4.(4)(5) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, for each fiscal year, beginning in the 2022–23 fiscal year through the 2028-29 fiscal year, the sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is hereby continuously appropriated, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and allocated as follows:(A) One hundred sixty-five million dollars ($165,000,000) for healthy forest and fire prevention programs and projects that improve forest health and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases caused by uncontrolled wildfires.(B) Thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) for the completion of prescribed fire and other fuel reduction projects through proven forestry practices consistent with the recommendations of the California Forest Carbon Plan, including the operation of year-round prescribed fire crews and implementation of a research and monitoring program for climate adaptation.(c) In determining the amount of the annual proceeds of the fund for purposes of the calculation in paragraphs (1) to (3), (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b), the funds subject to Section 39719.1 and the sum set forth in paragraph (4) (5) of subdivision (b) shall not be included.SECTION 1.Section 107250 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:107250.(a)The State Department of Public Health shall develop a plan with recommendations and guidelines for counties to use in the case of a significant air quality event caused by wildfires or other sources. The plan shall address all of the following:(1)Establishing policies and procedures that address respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A)Whether to make respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices available to county residents.(B)Whether to have stockpiles of respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices available for distribution.(C)Where to obtain respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices, if stockpiling.(D)How to distribute respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices, if stockpiling.(E)How to educate the public on when to use respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices.(F)Educating the public on keeping respiratory protection and other protective equipment in their homes, offices, and cars.(2)Making available respiratory protection and other protective equipment and devices to residents that are sensitive receptors and that are at risk of serious illness or complications resulting from inhaling highly polluted air from a significant air quality event caused by wildfires or other sources.(3)Providing information to residents on what they should do if the air quality index hits a significant threshold.(4)Providing information to residents regarding the health impacts of inhaling air pollution during a significant air quality event caused by wildfires or other sources.(5)Developing prevention strategies to assist residents in avoiding inhalation of air pollutants.(6)Disseminating the information in this subdivision to the public.(b)The recommendations in the plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include guidance about how a county, including a city and county, informs its residents about all of the following:(1)Unhealthy air quality.(2)The Air Quality Index.(3)The effect of air pollution on an individual’s health, including the symptoms someone may experience and where to go for medical assistance.(4)Where an individual can obtain protective respiratory protection and other protective equipment.(5)How and when to use respiratory protection and other protective equipment.(6)How and when an individual needing oxygen or respiratory medications can obtain oxygen or respiratory medications.(7)How to protect children, seniors, the disabled, the homebound, the homeless, those working outdoors, tourists, visitors, non-English speakers, and any others who may have difficulty obtaining or using masks or other protective equipment without assistance.(8)Any other information that is useful for an individual to protect their health, and the health of their loved ones, in the case of significantly poor air quality caused by wildfires or other sources.(c)The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall also include best practices and recommended protocols for reaching out to inform the general public about the recommendations and guidelines and shall include best practices and recommended protocols for reaching out specifically to vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, the homeless, elderly, disabled, and homebound.(d)The department shall develop the plan, pursuant to subdivision (a), in consultation with key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of all of the following:(1)Governor’s Office of Emergency Services.(2)State Air Resources Board.(3)Governor’s Office of Planning and Research.(4)California Department of Aging.(5)State Department of Developmental Services.(6)Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.(7)Medical professionals focused on respiratory health, pulmonology, pediatrics, and emergency medicine.(8)Small and large air pollution districts.(9)Counties.(10)Cities.(11)Hospitals.(12)Business organizations.(13)Nonprofit organizations involved in respiratory health.(14)Nonprofit organizations working on behalf of issues for individuals with disabilities.(15)Nonprofit organizations working on behalf of issues for the homeless.(16)Nonprofit organizations working on behalf of issues for seniors.(e)The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall supplement any resources developed by the department, on or before the effective date of this section, for counties to use in the case of a significant air quality event caused by wildfires or other sources.(f)For purposes of this chapter, “a significant air quality event” is defined as the period of time in which the duration of exposure and the level of particulate matter, or other indicators of air quality, are likely to result in negative health impacts.